Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1575.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3500 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Department of Human Services shall conduct a feasibility
study on the potential establishment of a unified and streamlined
eligibility and enrollment system for public assistance programs
administered by the state that would promote efficiency,
accessibility, and coordination of services across programs
including, but not limited to:
1. The Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP);
2. The Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) program;

3. Child care subsidies;
4. The Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP);
5. The state Medicaid program; and
6. The Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) program.
B. As part of the feasibility study, the Department shall issue
a request for information on a unified and streamlined eligibility
and enrollment system to gather information about potential vendors
and their capabilities and to ascertain an estimate of the initial
and ongoing costs of the system.
C. The Department of Human Services, the Oklahoma Health Care
Authority, and the State Department of Health shall coordinate to
conduct the feasibility study.
D. At the conclusion of the feasibility study, the Department
of Human Services shall electronically submit a report to the
President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate, the Speaker of
the Oklahoma House of Representatives, and the Governor that
summarizes the findings of the feasibility study including, but not
limited to, information obtained through the request for information
required under subsection B of this section and cost estimates of
the unified and streamlined eligibility and enrollment system.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1575 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 14th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1575 Page 3